Utah statutes.
34A-8a-301.   Initial report on injured worker.

(1)  An employer or the employer's workers' compensation insurance carrier shall prepare an initial written report assessing an injured worker's need or lack of need for vocational assistance in reemployment if:

(a)  it appears that the injured worker is or will be an injured worker with a disability; or

(b)  the period of the injured worker's temporary total disability compensation period exceeds 90 days.

(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), an employer or the employer's workers' compensation insurance carrier shall:

(i)  serve the initial written report required by Subsection (1) on the injured worker; and

(ii)  file the initial written report required by Subsection (1) with the division.

(b)  An employer or the employer's workers' compensation insurance carrier shall comply with Subsection (2)(a) by no later than 30 days after the earlier of the day on which:

(i)  it appears that the injured worker is or will be an injured worker with a disability; or

(ii)  the 90-day period described in Subsection (1)(b) ends.

(3)  With the initial written report required by Subsection (1), an employer or the employer's workers' compensation insurance carrier shall provide an injured worker information regarding reemployment.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

